Massachusetts, session 194th, S1826.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 91 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:- 
(f) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a retired police officer 
receiving a pension under this chapter who is employed by a city, town, or other municipal entity 
to perform police details or other police-related duties shall not be subject to any limitation on 
hours worked or compensation earned that would otherwise affect the retiree's pension benefits.